src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! Adjective inflection
! --------------------
!! The Lushootseed language adjectives are inflected in much the same way as nouns and verbs.

LEXICON A_with-PL_RED2
: DIM_CV1toCV2C ;
: SG-SUF ;
: PL_RED2 ;

LEXICON A_with-PL_RED2_PRF/s
: DIM_CV1toCV2C ;
: SG-SUF ;
: PL_RED2 ;

!LEXICON A_
!!: K ; CHECKME 2021-07-10
!PRE-POSS_01 ;

!LEXICON DET_
!: K ;

LEXICON DET-NEUTRAL-MSC_
K ;
LEXICON DET-NEUTRAL-FEM_
K ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
